North Dakota, session 69, SB2242.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT STUDY - INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION.
1. During the 2025-26 interim, the legislative management shall consider studying the institutions
of higher education under the control of the state board of higher education. The study must
include:
a. Methods to promote efficiency and collaboration among state institutions;
b. Consideration of statewide dual-credit expansion to develop standard three-year
bachelor degree programs;
c. An analysis of the cost of tuition and fees for students;
d. Consideration of the feasibility and desirability of a system of uniform transcripts and the
waiver of fees to transfer credits within the state higher education system;
e. Consideration of the feasibility and desirability of consolidating colleges and universities
and implementing satellite campuses of universities;
f. Research on the competitiveness among state institutions; and
g. An analysis of the quality of education provided at each state institution.
2. If selected, the legislative management shall appoint a committee for this study as follows:
a. The voting members of the committee, who must be appointed by the legislative
management, are:
(1) Three members of the senate, two from the party with the largest number of
members in the senate and one from the party with the second largest number of
members in the senate;
(2) Three members of the house of representatives, two from the party with the largest
number of members in the house of representatives and one from the party with the
second largest number of members in the house of representatives; and
(3) One member of the legislative assembly to serve as the committee chairman.
b. The nonvoting members of the committee are:
(1) The chairman of the state board of higher education;
(2) The student representative of the state board of higher education;
(3) The chancellor of the North Dakota university system, or the chancellor's designee;
(4) One representative of kindergarten through grade twelve education; and

S. B. NO. 2242 - PAGE 2
(5) One representative each of the manufacturing, health care, agriculture, and energy
industries.
3. The legislative management shall report its findings and recommendations, together with any
legislation required to implement the recommendations, to the seventieth legislative assembly.

S. B. NO. 2242 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2242.
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 89 Nays 4 Absent 1
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State